src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kondii_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kondie: # Noun 'shoulder / hartia' - full paradigm
     kondii+N+Sg+Nom: kondii
     kondii+N+Sg+Gen: kondien
     kondii+N+Sg+Acc: [kondii, kondien]
     kondii+N+Sg+Par: kondiedu
     kondii+N+Sg+Tra: kondiekse
     kondii+N+Sg+Abe: [kondieta, kondiettah]
     kondii+N+Sg+Com: kondienke
     kondii+N+Sg+Ine: kondies
     kondii+N+Sg+Ela: [kondiespäi, kondies]
     kondii+N+Sg+Ill: kondieh
     kondii+N+Sg+Ade: kondiel
     kondii+N+Sg+Abl: [kondielpäi, kondiel]
     kondii+N+Sg+All: kondiele
     kondii+N+Sg+Ess: kondiennu
     kondii+N+Sg+Ter: kondiessah
     kondii+N+Sg+Apr: kondielluo
     kondii+N+Pl+Nom: kondiet
     kondii+N+Pl+Gen: kondieloin
     kondii+N+Pl+Acc: kondiet
     kondii+N+Pl+Par: kondieloi
     kondii+N+Pl+Tra: kondieloikse
     kondii+N+Pl+Abe: [kondieloita, kondieloittah]
     kondii+N+Pl+Com: kondieloinke
     kondii+N+Pl+Ine: kondielois
     kondii+N+Pl+Ela: [kondieloispäi, kondielois]
     kondii+N+Pl+Ill: kondieloih
     kondii+N+Pl+Ade: kondieloil
     kondii+N+Pl+Abl: [kondieloilpäi, kondieloil]
     kondii+N+Pl+All: kondieloile
     kondii+N+Pl+Ess: kondieloinnu
     kondii+N+Pl+Ins: kondieloin
     kondii+N+Pl+Apr: kondieloilluo
     kondii+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: kondiigi
     kondii+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: kondiengi
     kondii+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [kondiigi, kondiengi]
     kondii+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: kondiedugi
     kondii+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: kondieksegi
     kondii+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [kondietagi, kondiettahgi]
     kondii+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: kondienkegi
     kondii+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: kondiesgi
     kondii+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [kondiespäigi, kondiesgi]
     kondii+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: kondiehgi
     kondii+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: kondielgi
     kondii+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [kondielpäigi, kondielgi]
     kondii+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: kondielegi
     kondii+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: kondiennugi
     kondii+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: kondiessahgi
     kondii+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: kondielluogi
     kondii+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: kondietgi
     kondii+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: kondieloingi
     kondii+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: kondietgi
     kondii+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: kondieloigi
     kondii+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: kondieloiksegi
     kondii+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [kondieloitagi, kondieloittahgi]
     kondii+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: kondieloinkegi
     kondii+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: kondieloisgi
     kondii+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [kondieloispäigi, kondieloisgi]
     kondii+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: kondieloihgi
     kondii+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: kondieloilgi
     kondii+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [kondieloilpäigi, kondieloilgi]
     kondii+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: kondieloilegi
     kondii+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: kondieloinnugi
     kondii+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: kondieloingi
     kondii+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: kondieloilluogi
